Maryland, session 2026, SB0375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–148.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 3.5–801 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP OR APPROVE AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TRAINING PROGRAM FOR MEMBERS OF COUNTY BOARDS THAT
INCLUDES:
(1) A FOUNDATIONAL TRAINING; AND
(2) CONTINUING ANNUAL TRAINING.
(C) (1) THE FOUNDATIONAL TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL CONTAIN THE FOLLOWING CURRICULUM COMPONENTS:
(I) FUNDAMENTALS OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE,
INCLUDING THE CAPABILITIES, LIMITATIONS, AND RISKS OF ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE;
(II) ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TECHNOLOGY USE POLICY
DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING SAFETY AND ETHICAL CONSIDERATIONS BY AGE AND
GRADE LEVEL;
(III) STUDENT PRIVACY AND DATA PROTECTION LAWS; AND
(IV) ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TECHNOLOGY PROCUREMENT
GUIDELINES AND OVERSIGHT.

SENATE BILL 375 3
(2) THE CONTINUING ANNUAL TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL CONTAIN THE FOLLOWING CURRICULUM
COMPONENTS:
(I) A SUMMARY OF THE TOPICS COVERED IN THE
FOUNDATIONAL TRAINING; AND
(II) DEVELOPMENTS IN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
TECHNOLOGY, EVOLVING BEST PRACTICES FOR USE IN EDUCATIONAL SETTINGS,
AND NEW GUIDANCE.
(D) THE TRAINING PROGRAM DEVELOPED OR APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE OFFERED:
(1) IN PERSON, ONLINE, OR IN A HYBRID FORMAT; AND
(2) BY AN ORGANIZATION RESPONSIBLE FOR THE PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT AND EDUCATION OF MEMBERS OF COUNTY BOARDS.
(E) (1) (I) WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE FIRST DAY OF A COUNTY BOARD
MEMBER’S TERM OF OFFICE, THE MEMBER SHALL COMPLETE THE FOUNDATIONAL
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION.
(II) A MEMBER OF A COUNTY BOARD IN OFFICE ON JULY 1,
2026, SHALL COMPLETE THE FOUNDATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TRAINING
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2027.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30 OF EACH YEAR OF A COUNTY BOARD
MEMBER’S TERM AFTER COMPLETION OF THE FOUNDATIONAL TRAINING, THE
MEMBER SHALL COMPLETE THE CONTINUING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TRAINING
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) (1) ON COMPLETION OF THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TRAINING
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION, A MEMBER OF A COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A
COPY OF THE MEMBER’S CERTIFICATE OF COMPLETION TO:
(I) THE PRESIDENT OF THE COUNTY BOARD ON WHICH THE
MEMBER SERVES; AND
(II) THE DEPARTMENT.

SENATE BILL 375
(2) A COUNTY BOARD OR THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH
PROCESSES TO AUTOMATICALLY RECORD A COUNTY BOARD MEMBER’S
COMPLETION OF THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IN PLACE OF THE SUBMISSION REQUIREMENT
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH A REPORT ON ITS WEBSITE
LISTING ANY MEMBER OF A COUNTY BOARD WHO DID NOT COMPLETE THE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION DURING THE PRIOR YEAR.
(G) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2028, AND EACH OCTOBER 1 EVERY 2
YEARS THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE
GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TRAINING PROGRAM FOR MEMBERS OF COUNTY BOARDS REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Artificial intelligence” means a machine–based system that:
(1) can, for a given set of human–defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual environments;
(2) uses machine and human–based inputs to perceive real and virtual
environments and abstracts those perceptions into models through analysis in an
automated manner; and
(3) uses model inference to formulate options for information or action.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.